Nevada, session 83, AB361.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 277A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. In a county whose population is 100,000 or more, a
commission shall:
(a) Install and maintain appropriate infrastructure and
technology designed to mitigate safety risks to transit operators,
including, without limitation, the use of:
(1) Barriers to restrict the unwanted entry of passengers
and unauthorized persons and objects into the workstation of a
transit operator; and
(2) Panic buttons and other technology designed to mitigate
safety risks to transit operators.
(b) Install and maintain appropriate signage informing the
public about the criminal penalties for crimes committed against
transit operators or the public, including, without limitation, the
criminal penalties for:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(1) Assault of a transit operator pursuant to NRS 200.471;
and
(2) Battery of a transit operator pursuant to NRS 200.481.
2. As used in this section, “transit operator” means a person
who holds a commercial driver’s license issued pursuant to NRS
483.900 to 483.940, inclusive, and who operates a bus or other
vehicle:
(a) As part of a public mass transportation system; and
(b) For which the person is required to hold a commercial
driver’s license issued pursuant to NRS 483.900 to 483.940,
inclusive, to operate the bus or other vehicle.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)